Maryland, session 2026, HB0851.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Human Services
7–1002.
(a) (1) There is a Maryland Statewide Independent Living Council that IS A
TAX–EXEMPT BODY POLITIC AND CORPORATE AND is an instrumentality of the State.
(2) The Council is the entity that was created in 1993 by an executive order
issued by the Governor, which established the Council in accordance with the federal
Rehabilitation Act.
(b) The Council shall:
(1) work in conjunction with Centers for Independent Living in submitting,
monitoring, implementing, and evaluating the State Plan; and
(2) carry out other duties as required under this subtitle and the federal
Rehabilitation Act to support the implementation of the State Plan.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 1 –